lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/h.twolc
Alphabet

a ā b c d e ē f g h i ī j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 

%^V:0 %^LongV:0 %^R:0 %^E:0 ;


Sets
Vow = a ā e ē o u i ī ;


Rules

"Long plural deletion rule"
Vx:0 <=> _ %^V: ?* %^LongV: ;
	where Vx in (a e i);
	
"Long plural lengthening rule"
%^V:Vy <=> Vx: _ ?* %^LongV: ;
	where Vx in (a e i)
	      Vy in (ā ē ī)
	      matched ;

"C re"
%^R:Cx <=> .#.            _ %^E:  Cx ;
!           .#.  (Cns) Vow _ %^E:    Cx ;
     where Cx in Cns ;
! REnofo -> nonofo
! REtuu -> tutuu

"^E realisation as vowel"
%^E:Vx <=> .#.            %^R: _   (Cns) Vx ;
!          .#.  (Cns) Vow %^R: _    (Cns) Vx ;
       where Vx in Vow ;
